es: Condición ocular tratada: Alergia; Anestésico; Antiinflamatorio; Rehumectación de lentes de contacto; Fatiga ocular digital; Ojo seco; Glaucoma; Infección; Picazón; Adormecedor; Cuidado postquirúrgico; Presión; Alivio del enrojecimiento; Otros
el: Οφθαλμική πάθηση που αντιμετωπίζεται: Αλλεργία; Αναισθητικό; Αντιφλεγμονώδες; Επανύγρανση φακών επαφής; Ψηφιακή κόπωση ματιών; Ξηρό μάτι; Γλαύκωμα; Λοίμωξη; Κνησμός; Μούδιασμα; Μετεγχειρητική φροντίδα; Πίεση; Ανακούφιση ερυθρότητας; Άλλο
sl-SI: Zdravljeno očesno stanje: Alergija; Anestetik; Protivnetno; Vlaženje kontaktnih leč; Digitalna utrujenost oči; Suho oko; Glavkom; Okužba; Srbenje; Omrtvičenje; Nega po operaciji; Pritisk; Lajšanje rdečice; Drugo
pt-BR: Condição ocular tratada: Alergia; Anestésico; Anti-inflamatório; Reumedecimento de lente de contato; Cansaço visual digital; Olho seco; Glaucoma; Infecção; Coceira; Anestesiante; Cuidados pós-cirúrgicos; Pressão; Alívio de vermelhidão; Outro
zh-CN: 治疗的眼部状况: 过敏; 麻醉; 抗炎; 隐形眼镜润湿; 数字眼疲劳; 干眼; 青光眼; 感染; 瘙痒; 麻木感; 术后护理; 压力表; 缓解充血; 其他
fr: Problème oculaire traité: Allergie; Anesthésique; Anti-inflammatoire; Réhydratation de lentilles de contact; Fatigue oculaire numérique; Sécheresse oculaire; Glaucome; Infection; Démangeaisons; Engourdissant; Soins post-chirurgicaux; Pression; Soulagement des rougeurs; Autre
tr: Tedavi edilen göz durumu: Alerji; Anestezik; İltihap önleyici; Kontakt lens nemlendirme; Dijital göz yorgunluğu; Göz kuruluğu; Glokom; Enfeksiyon; Kaşıntı; Uyuşturucu; Ameliyat sonrası bakım; Basınç; Kızarıklık giderici; Diğer
cs: Léčená oční vada: Alergie; Anestetikum; Protizánětlivé; Zvlhčení kontaktních čoček; Digitální namáhání očí; Suché oko; Glaukom; Infekce; Svědění; Znecitlivující; Pooperační péče; Tlak; Úleva od zarudnutí; Jiné
hu: Kezelt szemállapot: Allergia; Érzéstelenítő; Gyulladáscsökkentő; Kontaktlencse nedvesítés; Digitális szemfáradtság; Száraz szem; Glaukóma; Fertőzés; Viszketés; Zsibbasztó; Műtét utáni gondozás; Nyomás; Kivörösödés enyhítése; Egyéb
bg-BG: Лекувано очно състояние: Алергия; Анестетик; Противовъзпалителен; Овлажняване на контактни лещи; Дигитално напрежение на очите; Сухо око; Глаукома; Инфекция; Сърбеж; Обезболяващ; Следоперативна грижа; Налягане; Облекчаване на зачервяването; Други
vi: Tình trạng mắt được điều trị: Dị ứng; Gây tê; Kháng viêm; Làm ẩm kính áp tròng; Mỏi mắt kỹ thuật số; Khô mắt; Tăng nhãn áp; Nhiễm trùng; Ngứa; Tê; Chăm sóc sau phẫu thuật; Áp suất; Giảm đỏ mắt; Khác
zh-TW: 治療的眼部狀況: 過敏; 麻醉; 抗發炎; 隱形眼鏡濕潤; 數位眼疲勞; 乾眼; 青光眼; 感染; 搔癢; 麻痺感; 術後護理; 壓力; 紅眼緩解; 其他
ru: Устраняемое состояние глаз: Аллергия; Анестетик; Противовоспалительный; Повторное увлажнение контактных линз; Цифровое напряжение глаз; Сухой глаз; Глаукома; Инфекция; Зуд; Онемение; Послеоперационный уход; Давление; Устранение покраснения; Другой
da: Behandlet øjentilstand: Allergi; Bedøvende; Betændelseshæmmende; Kontaktlinse genbefugtning; Digital øjenbelastning; Tørt øje; Glaukom; Infektion; Kløe; Bedøvende; Postoperativ pleje; Tryk; Rødheds lindring; Andet
sv: Behandlad ögonåkomma: Allergi; Bedövning; Antiinflammatorisk; Återfuktning av kontaktlinser; Digital ögontrötthet; Torra ögon; Glaukom; Infektion; Klåda; Bedövande; Eftervård efter operation; Tryck; Lindring av rodnad; Övrigt
th: สภาวะตาที่รักษา: โรคภูมิแพ้; ยาชา; ต้านการอักเสบ; เติมความชุ่มชื้นคอนแทคเลนส์; อาการตาล้าจากหน้าจอ; ตาแห้ง; ต้อหิน; การติดเชื้อ; อาการคัน; ชาเฉพาะที่; ดูแลหลังผ่าตัด; ความดัน; บรรเทาอาการแดง; อื่นๆ
pl: Schorzenia oczu podlegające leczeniu: Alergia; Znieczulające; Przeciwzapalny; Nawilżanie soczewek kontaktowych; Zmęczenie oczu cyfrowe; Suche oko; Jaskra; Infekcja; Swędzenie; Odrętwienie; Opieka pooperacyjna; Ciśnienie; Łagodzenie zaczerwienienia; Inne
fi: Hoidettu silmäsairaus: Allergia; Puuduttava; Tulehdusta ehkäisevä; Piilolinssien kostutus; Digitaalinen silmärasitus; Kuiva silmä; Glaukooma; Infektio; Kutina; Puuduttava; Leikkauksen jälkeinen hoito; Paine; Punoituksen lievitys; Muu
lt-LT: Gydoma akių būklė: Alergija; Anestetikas; Priešuždegiminis; Kontaktinių lęšių sudrėkinimas; Skaitmeninė akių įtampa; Sausa akis; Glaukoma; Infekcija; Niežėjimas; Nutirpdantis; Pooperacinė priežiūra; Slėgis; Paraudimo mažinimas; Kita
hr-HR: Liječeno stanje oka: Filtriranje alergena; Anestetik; Protuupalno; Ponovno vlaženje kontaktnih leća; Digitalno naprezanje oka; Suho oko; Glaukom; Infekcija; Svrbež; Umrtvljujuće; Postoperativna njega; Pritisak; Ublažavanje crvenila; Ostalo
de: Behandelte Augenerkrankung: Allergie; Betäubungsmittel; Entzündungshemmend; Kontaktlinsen-Nachbenetzung; Digitale Augenbelastung; Trockenes Auge; Glaukom; Infektion; Juckreiz; Betäubend; Nachoperative Pflege; Druck; Rötungslinderung; Sonstiges
ja: 治療対象眼疾患: アレルギー; 麻酔; 抗炎症; コンタクトレンズ再湿潤; デジタル眼精疲労; ドライアイ; 緑内障; 感染症; かゆみ; 麻痺; 術後ケア; 圧力計; 充血緩和; その他
ko: 치료되는 눈 상태: 알레르기; 마취; 항염증; 콘택트렌즈 재습윤; 디지털 눈 피로; 안구 건조; 녹내장; 감염; 가려움; 무감각; 수술 후 관리; 압력; 충혈 완화; 기타
en: Eye condition treated: Allergy; Anesthetic; Anti-inflammatory; Contact lens rewetting; Digital eye strain; Dry eye; Glaucoma; Infection; Itching; Numbing; Post-surgery care; Pressure; Redness relief; Other
sk-SK: Ošetrenie očného ochorenia: Alergia; Anestetikum; Protizápalový; Zvlhčenie kontaktných šošoviek; Digitálna únava očí; Suché oko; Glaukóm; Infekcia; Svrbenie; Znecitlivujúci; Pooperačná starostlivosť; Tlak; Úľava od začervenania; Iné
nl: Behandelde oogaandoening: Allergie; Verdovend; Ontstekingsremmend; Contactlens herbevochtiging; Digitale oogvermoeidheid; Droge ogen; Glaucoom; Infectie; Jeuk; Verdovend; Nazorg na operatie; Druk; Verlichting van roodheid; Andere
pt-PT: Condição ocular tratada: Alergia; Anestésico; Anti-inflamatório; Re-humidificação de lentes de contacto; Fadiga ocular digital; Olho seco; Glaucoma; Infeção; Comichão; Entorpecente; Cuidados pós-cirúrgicos; Pressão; Alívio da vermelhidão; Outro
ro-RO: Afecțiune oculară tratată: Alergii; Anestezic; Antiinflamator; Reumezire lentile de contact; Oboseală oculară digitală; Ochi uscat; Glaucom; Infecție; Mâncărime; Anesteziant; Îngrijire postoperatorie; Presiune; Ameliorarea roșeții; Altele
it: Condizione oculare trattata: Allergia; Anestetico; Antinfiammatorio; Reidratazione lenti a contatto; Affaticamento oculare digitale; Occhio secco; Glaucoma; Infezione; Prurito; Anestetizzante; Cura post-chirurgica; Pressione; Sollievo arrossamento; Altro
nb: Behandlet øyetilstand: Allergi; Bedøvende; Betennelsesdempende; Gjenoppfukting av kontaktlinser; Digital øyebelastning; Tørre øyne; Glaukom; Infeksjon; Kløe; Bedøvende; Postoperativ pleie; Trykk; Rødhetslindring; Annet